Utah statutes.
75-5-503.   Power of attorney -- Prohibitions and restrictions.
A power of attorney may not be construed to grant authority to an attorney-in-
fact or agent to perform any of the following, unless expressly authorized in
the power of attorney:
(1)  create, modify, or revoke an inter vivos revocable trust created by the
principal;
(2)  fund, with the principal's property, a trust not created by the principal
or by a person authorized to create a trust on behalf of the principal;
(3)  make or revoke a gift of the principal's property, in trust or otherwise;
or
(4)  designate or change the designation of beneficiaries to receive any
property, benefit, or contract right on the principal's death.
